Utah statutes.
77-40-105.   Eligibility for expungement of conviction -- Requirements.
(1)  A person convicted of a crime may apply to the bureau for a certificate
of eligibility to expunge the record of conviction as provided in this
section.
(2)  A petitioner is not eligible to receive a certificate of eligibility from
the bureau if:
(a)  the conviction for which expungement is sought is:
(i)  a capital felony;
(ii)  a first degree felony;
(iii)  a violent felony as defined in Subsection 76-3-203.5(1)(c)(i);
(iv)  automobile homicide;
(v)  a felony violation of Subsection 41-6a-501(2); or
(vi)  a registerable sex offense as defined in Subsection 77-27-21.5(1)(n);
(b)  a proceeding involving a crime is pending or being investigated in any
jurisdiction against the petitioner; or
(c)  the petitioner intentionally or knowingly provides false or misleading
information on the application for a certificate of eligibility.
(3)  A petitioner seeking to obtain expungement for a criminal record is not
eligible to receive a certificate of eligibility from the bureau until all of
the following have occurred:
(a)  all fines and interest ordered by the court have been paid in full;
(b)  all restitution ordered by the court pursuant to Section 77-38a-302, or
by the Board of Pardons and Parole pursuant to Section 77-27-6, has been paid
in full; and
(c)  the following time periods have elapsed from the date the petitioner was
convicted or released from incarceration, parole, or probation, whichever
occurred last, for each conviction the petitioner seeks to expunge:
(i)  10 years in the case of a misdemeanor conviction of Subsection
41-6a-501(2) or a felony violation of Subsection 58-37-8(2)(g);
(ii)  seven years in the case of a felony;
(iii)  five years in the case of a class A misdemeanor;
(iv)  four years in the case of a class B misdemeanor; or
(v)  three years in the case of any other misdemeanor or infraction.
(4)  The bureau may not issue a certificate of eligibility if, at the time the
petitioner seeks a certificate of eligibility, the bureau determines that the
petitioner's criminal history, including previously expunged convictions,
contains any of the following:
(a)  two or more felony convictions, each of which is contained in a separate
criminal episode;
(b)  any combination of three or more convictions that include two class A
misdemeanor convictions, each of which is contained in a separate criminal
episode;
(c)  any combination of four or more convictions that include three class B
misdemeanor convictions, each of which is contained in a separate criminal
episode; or
(d)  five or more convictions of any degree whether misdemeanor or felony,
excluding infractions, each of which is contained in a separate criminal
episode.
(5)  If the petitioner has received a pardon from the Utah Board of Pardons
and Parole, the petitioner is entitled to a certificate of eligibility for all
pardoned crimes.
